Indiana, session 2026, HB1157.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 31-10-2-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.210-2019,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) For purposes of:
(1) IC 31-14;
(2) IC 31-15-4-8; and
(3) IC 31-17;
the court shall consider the best interests of the child, which
includes promoting continuity of relationship by both parents with
the child through maximum practical parenting time with each
parent, when making any decision concerning the child.
(b) For purposes of:
(1) IC 31-33;
(2) IC 31-34; and
(3) IC 31-35;
all decisions made by the department or the court shall be made in
consideration of the best interests of the child or children concerned.
SECTION 2. IC 31-14-13-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
2026 IN 1157—LS 6624/DI 148


FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. The court shall
determine custody in accordance with the best interests of the child. In
determining the child's best interests, there is not a presumption
favoring either parent. The court shall consider all relevant factors,
including the following:
(1) The age and sex of the child.
(2) The wishes of the child's parents.
(3) The wishes of the child, with more consideration given to the
child's wishes if the child is at least fourteen (14) years of age.
(4) The interaction and interrelationship of the child with:
(A) the child's parents;
(B) the child's siblings; and
(C) any other person who may significantly affect the child's
best interest.
(5) The child's adjustment to home, school, and community.
(6) The mental and physical health of all individuals involved.
(7) The ability of the parties to encourage the sharing of love,
affection, and contact between the child and the other party.
(7) (8) Evidence of a pattern of domestic or family violence by
either parent.
(8) (9) Evidence that the child has been cared for by a de facto
custodian, and if the evidence is sufficient, the court shall
consider the factors described in section 2.5(b) of this chapter.
SECTION 3. IC 31-14-13-2.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.4. (a) Parents must be
encouraged to develop the parents' own parenting plans and
parenting time calendars to be submitted under joint signature for
approval by the court. If the parents are unable to agree to a part
of the plan, the court shall provide the required components
according to the best interests of the child.
(b) If the parents are in total disagreement under subsection (a),
the parenting time guidelines apply.
(c) The court must make specific findings of fact and
conclusions of law on the record to support any deviation of
parenting time that falls below the minimum standards in the
parenting time guidelines.
SECTION 4. IC 31-14-14-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.223-2019,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) A noncustodial parent is entitled to
reasonable maximum practical parenting time rights unless the court
finds, after a hearing, that parenting time might:
2026 IN 1157—LS 6624/DI 148


(1) endanger the child's physical health and well-being; or
(2) significantly impair the child's emotional development.
(b) The court may interview the child in chambers to assist the court
in determining the child's perception of whether parenting time by the
noncustodial parent might endanger the child's physical health or
significantly impair the child's emotional development.
(c) In a hearing under subsection (a), there is a rebuttable
presumption that a person who has been convicted of:
(1) child molesting (IC 35-42-4-3); or
(2) child exploitation (IC 35-42-4-4(b) or IC 35-42-4-4(c));
might endanger the child's physical health and well-being or
significantly impair the child's emotional development.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (e), if a court grants parenting
time rights to a person who has been convicted of:
(1) child molesting (IC 35-42-4-3); or
(2) child exploitation (IC 35-42-4-4(b) or IC 35-42-4-4(c));
there is a rebuttable presumption that the parenting time with the child
must be supervised.
(e) If a court grants parenting time rights to a person who has been
convicted of:
(1) child molesting (IC 35-42-4-3); or
(2) child exploitation (IC 35-42-4-4(b) or IC 35-42-4-4(c));
within the previous five (5) years, the court shall order that the
parenting time with the child must be supervised.
(f) The court may permit counsel to be present at the interview. If
counsel is present:
(1) a record may be made of the interview; and
(2) the interview may be made part of the record for purposes of
appeal.
SECTION 5. IC 31-17-2-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.194-2017,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. The court shall determine custody and enter a
custody order in accordance with the best interests of the child. In
determining the best interests of the child, there is no presumption
favoring either parent. The court shall consider all relevant factors,
including the following:
(1) The age and sex of the child.
(2) The wishes of the child's parent or parents.
(3) The wishes of the child, with more consideration given to the
child's wishes if the child is at least fourteen (14) years of age.
(4) The interaction and interrelationship of the child with:
(A) the child's parent or parents;
2026 IN 1157—LS 6624/DI 148


(B) the child's sibling; and
(C) any other person who may significantly affect the child's
best interests.
(5) The child's adjustment to the child's:
(A) home;
(B) school; and
(C) community.
(6) The mental and physical health of all individuals involved.
(7) The ability of the parties to encourage the sharing of love,
affection, and contact between the child and the other party.
(7) (8) Evidence of a pattern of domestic or family violence by
either parent.
(8) (9) Evidence that the child has been cared for by a de facto
custodian, and if the evidence is sufficient, the court shall
consider the factors described in section 8.5(b) of this chapter.
(9) (10) A designation in a power of attorney of:
(A) the child's parent; or
(B) a person found to be a de facto custodian of the child.
SECTION 6. IC 31-17-2-8.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 8.6. (a) Parents must be encouraged to develop the
parents' own parenting plans and parenting time calendars to be
submitted under joint signature for approval by the court. If the
parents are unable to agree to a part of the plan, the court shall
provide the required components according to the best interests of
the child.
(b) If the parents are in total disagreement under subsection (a),
the parenting time guidelines apply.
(c) The court must make specific findings of fact and
conclusions of law on the record to support any deviation of
parenting time that falls below the minimum standards in the
parenting time guidelines.
SECTION 7. IC 31-17-4-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.146-2021,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Subject to subsections (d) and (e) and
subject to section 1.1 of this chapter, a parent not granted custody of
the child is entitled to reasonable maximum practical parenting time
rights unless the court finds, after a hearing, that parenting time by the
noncustodial parent might endanger the child's physical health or
significantly impair the child's emotional development.
(b) The court may interview the child in chambers to assist the court
in determining the child's perception of whether parenting time by the
2026 IN 1157—LS 6624/DI 148


noncustodial parent might endanger the child's physical health or
significantly impair the child's emotional development.
(c) The court may permit counsel to be present at the interview. If
counsel is present:
(1) a record may be made of the interview; and
(2) the interview may be made part of the record for purposes of
appeal.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (e), if a court grants parenting
time rights to a person who has been convicted of:
(1) child molesting (IC 35-42-4-3); or
(2) child exploitation (IC 35-42-4-4(b) or IC 35-42-4-4(c));
there is a rebuttable presumption that the parenting time with the child
must be supervised.
(e) If a court grants parenting time rights to a person who has been
convicted of:
(1) child molesting (IC 35-42-4-3); or
(2) child exploitation (IC 35-42-4-4(b) or IC 35-42-4-4(c));
within the previous five (5) years, the court shall order that the
parenting time with the child must be supervised.
2026 IN 1157—LS 6624/DI 148